Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.030

Forms of estimates—Penalty for delay.

The estimates required in RCW 36.40.010 and 36.40.020 shall be submitted on forms provided by the county auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county and classified according to the classification established by the state auditor. The county auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county shall provide such forms. He or she shall also prepare the estimates for interest and debt redemption requirements and any other estimates the preparation of which properly falls within the duties of his or her office.

Each such official shall file his or her estimates within the time and in the manner provided in the notice and form and the county auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county may deduct and withhold as a penalty from the salary of each official failing or refusing to file such estimates as herein provided, the sum of fifty dollars for each day of delay: PROVIDED, That the total penalty against any one official shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars in any one year.

In the absence or disability of any official the duties required herein shall devolve upon the official or employee in charge of the office, department, service, or institution for the time being. The notice shall contain a copy of this penalty clause.

[ 2009 c 337 s 7; 1995 c 301 s 62; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.030. Prior: 1923 c 164 s 1, part; RRS s 3997-1, part.]